North Dakota statutes. TITLE 59 Trusts
CHAPTER 59-19 Application and Electronic Records and Signatures

59-19-01. (1102)
Electronic records and signatures.

The provisions of chapters 59-09, 59-10, 59-11, 59-12, 59-13, 59-14, 59-15, 59-16, 59-17, 59-18, and 59-19 governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, conform to the requirements of section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act [15 U.S.C. 7002] and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 25.

Law Reviews.

Article: Improving the Law Through Codification: Adoption of the Uniform Trust Code in North Dakota, see 86 N.D. L. Rev. 321 (2010).

59-19-02. (1106)
Application to existing relationships.

Except as otherwise provided in chapters 59-09, 59-10, 59-11, 59-12, 59-13, 59-14, 59-15, 59-16, 59-17, 59-18, and 59-19, effective August 1, 2007, these chapters:

Apply to all trusts created after July 31, 2007; and

Apply to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts which are commenced after July 31, 2007.

Except as otherwise provided in chapters 59-09, 59-10, 59-11, 59-12, 59-13, 59-14, 59-15, 59-16, 59-17, 59-18, and 59-19, from August 1, 2007, through July 31, 2009:

A trust created before August 1, 2007, may elect to be subject to chapters 59-09, 59-10, 59-11, 59-12, 59-13, 59-14, 59-15, 59-16, 59-17, 59-18, and 59-19; however, that trust must be in compliance with those chapters by August 1, 2009;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in chapters 59-09, 59-10, 59-11, 59-12, 59-13, 59-14, 59-15, 59-16, 59-17, 59-18, and 59-19 applies to trust instruments executed before August 1, 2009, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust;

Chapters 59-09, 59-10, 59-11, 59-12, 59-13, 59-14, 59-15, 59-16, 59-17, 59-18, and 59-19 do not apply to judicial proceedings concerning trusts which are commenced before that date unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of these chapters would not substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of these chapters applies and the superseded law does not apply; and

An act done before August 1, 2009, is not affected by chapters 59-09, 59-10, 59-11, 59-12, 59-13, 59-14, 59-15, 59-16, 59-17, 59-18, and 59-19.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before August 1, 2007, for those trusts that are subject to subsection 1, or before August 1, 2009, for those trusts that are subject to subsection 2, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 25.